California, session 20252026, AB1695.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 50899.20) is added to Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 20. Smoke-Free State-Subsidized Multiunit Housing50899.20. (a) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(1) “Smoking” has the same meaning as in subdivision (c) of Section 22950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.(2) “State-subsidized multiunit housing development” means a property containing two or more units that was financed in whole or in part by state grants or other forms of state funding, including, but not limited to, low-income housing tax credits.(3) “Tobacco product” means a product or device as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 29950.5 of the Business and Professions Code.(b) Smoking tobacco products is prohibited in any indoor area, including any individual unit or common area, of a state-subsidized multiunit housing development for which a certificate of occupancy is issued on or after January 1, 2027.